apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<pardef n="cl/ore__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ore</l>      <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oses</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>      <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osant</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osons</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osez</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osent</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ôt</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orons</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orai</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orez</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oras</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oront</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ora</l>      <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osions</l>   <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>      <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osiez</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oses</l>     <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osent</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>      <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orions</l>   <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orais</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oriez</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orais</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oraient</l>  <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orait</l>    <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>       <r>ore<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fri/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>      <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>        <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>      <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sant</l>     <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>        <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>        <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>        <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rai</l>      <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ras</l>      <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>       <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rais</l>     <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rais</l>     <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rait</l>     <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>        <r>fri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!--secció de metaparadigmes-->
<pardef n="lu/i[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="luî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="lui/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/i[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="di/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="r/i[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="ri/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="concl/u[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>û</l>         <r>u</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>u<prm/></i><par n="conclu/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="incl/u[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>û</l>         <r>u</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>u<prm/></i><par n="inclu/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="maud/i[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="maudi/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contred/i[]re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="contredi/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="about/[]ir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="aboutî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i<prm/></i><par n="abouti/r__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>é<prm/></i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abr/é[G]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>é<prm/></i><par n="abrég/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>e<prm/></i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef><!--fi secció de metaparadigmes-->
  </pardefs>

<e lm="abréger"><i>abr</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="agréger"><i>agr</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="alléger"><i>all</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="alourdir"><i>alourd</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="assécher"><i>ass</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="ch"/></e>
<e lm="assiéger"><i>assi</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="bannir" a="joan"><i>bann</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="breveter"><i>brev</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
<e lm="conclure"><i>concl</i><par n="concl/u[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="congeler"><i>cong</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="l"/></e>
<e lm="contredire"><i>contred</i><par n="contred/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="coopérer"><i>coop</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="r"/></e>
<e lm="dire au revoir à"><i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>au<b/>revoir<b/>à</l><r><g><b/>au<b/>revoir<b/>à</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dire au revoir"><i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>au<b/>revoir</l><r><g><b/>au<b/>revoir</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dire"><i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="redéfinir"><i>redéfin</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="déléguer"><i>dél</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="gu"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="élever"><p><l>El</l>                     <r>él</r></p><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/></e>
<e lm="ensevelir"><i>ensevel</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="exclure"><i>excl</i><par n="concl/u[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="excréter"><i>excr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
<e lm="geler"><i>g</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="l"/></e>
<e lm="gravir"><i>grav</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="ingérer"><i>ing</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="r"/></e>
<e lm="interdire"><i>interd</i><par n="contred/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="luire"><i>lu</i><par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="mener"><i>m</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/></e>
<e lm="maudire"><i>maud</i><par n="maud/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="noircir" a="hector"><i>noirc</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opérer"><i>op</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="r"/></e>
<e lm="piéger"><i>pi</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="protéger"><i>prot</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex" prm="g"/></e>
<e lm="prédire"><i>préd</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="rire à gorge déployée"><p><l>r</l>              <r>r</r></p><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>à<b/>gorge<b/>déployée</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>gorge<b/>déployée</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rire à la barbe"><p><l>r</l>                    <r>r</r></p><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>à<b/>la<b/>barbe</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>la<b/>barbe</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rire dans sa barbe"><i>r</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>dans<b/>sa<b/>barbe</l><r><g><b/>dans<b/>sa<b/>barbe</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rire"><i>r</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="rire sous cape"><i>r</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>sous<b/>cape</l><r><g><b/>sous<b/>cape</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="racheter"><i>rach</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
<e lm="rafraîchir"><i>rafraîch</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="refléter"><i>refl</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
<e lm="réagir"><i>réag</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="sourire"><i>sour</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="subir"><i>sub</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="suffire à"><i>suff</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>à</l><r><g><b/>à</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="suffire de"><i>suff</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="suffire"><i>suff</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="tempérer"><i>temp</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="r"/></e>
<e lm="traduire"><i>tradu</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="élever"><i>él</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/></e>
<e lm="étourdir"><i>étourd</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex" prm=""/></e>
    <e lm="ébiseler" a="automatique">        <i>ébis</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="l"/></e>
<e lm="inclure"><i>incl</i><par n="incl/u[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="occlure"><i>occl</i><par n="incl/u[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="reclure"><i>recl</i><par n="incl/u[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
<e lm="redire"><i>red</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
    <e lm="téter" a="automatique">        <i>t</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
    <e lm="peler" a="automatique">        <i>p</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="l"/></e>
<e lm="clore"><i>cl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="déclore"><i>décl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enclore"><i>encl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forclore"><i>forcl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reclore"><i>recl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="éclore"><i>écl</i><par n="cl/ore__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frire"><i>fri</i><par n="fri/re__vblex"/></e>
